hr-HR: Uključena stava za stroj za mjehuriće: AC adapter uključen; Baterije uključene; Koncentrat/bočica za punjenje mjehurića uključeni; Stalak za aparat za mjehuriće uključen; Otopina za mjehuriće uključena; Pladanj/posuda za otopinu uključena; Ručka/remen za nošenje uključeni; Upute za upotrebu uključene; Daljinski upravljač uključen; Zamjenski prstenovi za mjehuriće uključeni; Rezervni štapići za mjehuriće uključeni; USB kabel za punjenje uključen; Ostalo
fr: Éléments inclus avec la machine à bulles: Adaptateur secteur inclus; Piles incluses; Concentré pour bulles/bouteille de recharge inclus; Support de machine à bulles inclus; Liquide à bulles inclus; Bac/récipient à liquide à bulles inclus; Poignée/sangle de transport incluse; Manuel d’instructions inclus; Télécommande incluse; Anneaux à bulles de rechange inclus; Baguette(s) à bulles de rechange incluse(s); Câble de recharge USB inclus; Autre
el: Αντικείμενα που περιλαμβάνονται στη συσκευασία της μηχανής φουσκών: Περιλαμβάνεται μετασχηματιστής AC; Περιλαμβάνονται μπαταρίες; Περιλαμβάνεται συμπύκνωμα/ανταλλακτικό μπουκάλι; Περιλαμβάνεται βάση μηχανής; Περιλαμβάνεται υγρό για φούσκες; Περιλαμβάνεται δίσκος/πιατάκι για υγρό; Περιλαμβάνεται λαβή/ιμάντας μεταφοράς; Περιλαμβάνεται εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών; Περιλαμβάνεται τηλεχειριστήριο; Περιλαμβάνονται ανταλλακτικοί δακτύλιοι; Περιλαμβάνονται εφεδρικά ραβδιά; Περιλαμβάνεται καλώδιο φόρτισης USB; Άλλο
zh-CN: 泡泡机套装包含物品: 包含交流适配器; 包含电池; 包含浓缩泡泡液/补充瓶; 包含泡泡机支架; 包含泡泡液; 包含泡泡液托盘/盘子; 包含提手/肩带; 包含使用说明书; 包含遥控器; 包含替换泡泡环; 包含备用泡泡棒; 包含 USB 充电线; 其他
sv: Bubbelmaskinartiklar som ingår: AC-adapter ingår; Batterier ingår; Bubbelkoncentrat/påfyllningsflaska ingår; Stativ för bubbelmaskin ingår; Bubbelvätska ingår; Bricka/fat för bubbelvätska ingår; Bärhandtag/-rem ingår; Bruksanvisning ingår; Fjärrkontroll ingår; Reservbubbelringar ingår; Reservbubbelstav(ar) ingår; USB-laddningskabel ingår; Övrigt
bg-BG: Включени артикули за машина за балончета: Включен AC адаптер; Включени батерии; Включен концентрат/бутилка за пълнене; Включена стойка за машината; Включена течност за балончета; Включена тавичка/чинийка за течност; Включена дръжка/презрамка за носене; Включено ръководство за употреба; Включено дистанционно управление; Включени резервни пръстени за балончета; Включени резервни пръчици за балончета; Включен USB кабел за зареждане; Друго
pt-BR: Itens incluídos com a máquina de bolhas: Adaptador CA incluído; Pilhas incluídas; Concentrado de bolhas/frasco de refil incluído; Suporte de máquina de bolhas incluído; Solução para bolhas incluída; Bandeja/prato de solução para bolhas incluído(a); Alça de transporte incluída; Manual de instruções incluído; Controle remoto incluído; Anéis de bolhas de reposição incluídos; Bastão(ões) de bolhas reserva(s) incluído(s); Cabo de carregamento USB incluído; Outros
en: Bubble machine items included: AC adapter included; Batteries included; Bubble concentrate/refill bottle included; Bubble machine stand included; Bubble solution included; Bubble solution tray/dish included; Carrying handle/strap included; Instruction manual included; Remote control included; Replacement bubble rings included; Spare bubble wand(s) included; USB charging cable included; Other
lt-LT: Įtraukti burbulų mašinos daiktai: Pridedamas kintamosios srovės adapteris; Pridedamos baterijos; Pridedamas burbulų koncentratas / papildymo buteliukas; Pridedamas burbulų mašinos stovas; Pridedamas burbulų skystis; Pridedamas burbulų skysčio padėklas / indelis; Pridedama nešiojimo rankena / dirželis; Pridedama naudojimo instrukcija; Pridedamas nuotolinio valdymo pultas; Pridedami pakaitiniai burbulų žiedai; Pridedamas (-i) atsarginis (-iai) burbulų pūtimo žiedelis (-iai); Pridedamas USB įkrovimo laidas; Kita
de: Enthaltene Artikel der Seifenblasenmaschine: Netzteil im Lieferumfang enthalten; Batterien im Lieferumfang enthalten; Seifenblasenkonzentrat/-nachfüllflasche enthalten; Ständer für Seifenblasenmaschine enthalten; Seifenblasenlösung enthalten; Schale/Behälter für Seifenblasenlösung enthalten; Tragegriff/-gurt enthalten; Bedienungsanleitung enthalten; Fernbedienung enthalten; Ersatz-Seifenblasenringe enthalten; Ersatz-Seifenblasenstäbe enthalten; USB-Ladekabel enthalten; Sonstiges
nb: Boblemaskin inkludert: Strømadapter inkludert; Batterier inkludert; Boblekonsentrat/påfyllingsflaske inkludert; Boblemaskinstativ inkludert; Boblesåpe inkludert; Skål/brett til boblesåpe inkludert; Bærehåndtak/stropp inkludert; Bruksanvisning inkludert; Fjernkontroll inkludert; Ekstra bobleringer inkludert; Ekstra boblepinner inkludert; USB-ladekabel inkludert; Annet
hu: Buborékgép mellékelt elemei: AC adapterrel; Elemekkel; Buborékkoncentrátummal/utántöltővel; Állvánnyal; Buborékfújó folyadékkal; Tálcával/tállal a folyadéknak; Hordozófogantyúval/pánttal; Használati útmutatóval; Távirányítóval; Csere-buborékgyűrűkkel; Tartalék buborékfújóval; USB töltőkábellel; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vključeni kosi k stroju za mehurčke: Priložen napajalnik (AC); Priložene baterije; Priložena steklenička s koncentratom/polnilom za mehurčke; Priloženo stojalo za aparat za mehurčke; Priložena tekočina za mehurčke; Priložena posoda/pladenj za tekočino; Priložen ročaj/trak za prenašanje; Priložena navodila za uporabo; Priložen daljinski upravljalnik; Priloženi nadomestni obroči za mehurčke; Priložene nadomestne palčke za mehurčke; Priložen polnilni kabel USB; Drugo
nl: Bellenmachine meegeleverde items: Inclusief netstroomadapter; Inclusief batterijen; Bellenblaasconcentraat/navulfles inbegrepen; Standaard voor bellenblaasmachine inbegrepen; Inclusief bellenblaassop; Bakje/schaaltje voor bellenblaassop inbegrepen; Draaghandvat/draagriem inbegrepen; Inclusief handleiding; Inclusief afstandsbediening; Vervangende bellenblaasringen inbegrepen; Reserve-bellenblaassta(a)f(ven) inbegrepen; Inclusief USB-oplaadkabel; Overig
cs: Součásti balení bublinkovače: Včetně AC adaptéru; Včetně baterií; Včetně koncentrátu / náhradní láhve na bubliny; Včetně stojanu na výrobník bublin; Včetně roztoku na bubliny; Včetně podnosu/misky na roztok; Včetně rukojeti/popruhu na přenášení; Včetně návodu k použití; Včetně dálkového ovládání; Včetně náhradních kroužků na bubliny; Včetně náhradních hůlek na bubliny; Včetně nabíjecího USB kabelu; Jiné
it: Articolo macchina per bolle incluso: Adattatore CA incluso; Batterie incluse; Flacone di ricarica/concentrato per bolle incluso; Supporto per macchina delle bolle incluso; Liquido per bolle incluso; Vassoio/piattino per liquido per bolle incluso; Maniglia/cinghia per il trasporto inclusa; Manuale di istruzioni incluso; Telecomando incluso; Anelli per bolle di ricambio inclusi; Bacchetta/e per bolle di ricambio inclusa/e; Cavo di ricarica USB incluso; Altro
vi: Các mặt hàng đi kèm máy thổi bong bóng: Kèm bộ đổi nguồn AC; Kèm pin; Kèm dung dịch đặc/bình thay thế; Kèm giá đỡ máy tạo bong bóng; Kèm dung dịch tạo bong bóng; Kèm khay/đĩa đựng dung dịch tạo bong bóng; Kèm tay cầm/dây đeo; Kèm sách hướng dẫn; Kèm điều khiển từ xa; Kèm vòng tạo bong bóng thay thế; Kèm que thổi bong bóng dự phòng; Kèm cáp sạc USB; Khác
es: Artículos incluidos con la máquina de burbujas: Adaptador de CA incluido; Pilas incluidas; Concentrado de burbujas/botella de repuesto incluida; Soporte para máquina de burbujas incluido; Solución de burbujas incluida; Bandeja/plato para solución de burbujas incluido; Asa/correa de transporte incluida; Manual de instrucciones incluido; Control remoto incluido; Anillos de burbujas de repuesto incluidos; Varita(s) de burbujas de repuesto incluida(s); Cable de carga USB incluido; Otro
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับเครื่องทำฟองสบู่ที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: มาพร้อมอะแดปเตอร์ AC; มาพร้อมแบตเตอรี่; มาพร้อมน้ำยาเข้มข้น/ขวดเติม; มาพร้อมขาตั้งเครื่อง; มาพร้อมน้ำยาสบู่; มาพร้อมถาด/จานใส่น้ำยา; มาพร้อมหูหิ้ว/สายสะพาย; มาพร้อมคู่มือการใช้งาน; มาพร้อมรีโมตควบคุม; มาพร้อมวงแหวนพ่นฟองอะไหล่; มาพร้อมไม้เป่าฟองอะไหล่; มาพร้อมสายชาร์จ USB; อื่นๆ
ru: Комплектация генератора пузырей: Блок питания в комплекте; Батарейки в комплекте; Концентрат/бутылка с раствором в комплекте; Стойка для генератора мыльных пузырей в комплекте; Раствор для пузырей в комплекте; Лоток/емкость для раствора в комплекте; Ручка/ремень для переноски в комплекте; Руководство пользователя в комплекте; Пульт ДУ в комплекте; Сменные кольца для пузырей в комплекте; Запасные палочки для пузырей в комплекте; USB-кабель для зарядки в комплекте; Другое
da: Medfølgende dele til boblemaskinen: AC-adapter inkluderet; Batterier inkluderet; Boblekoncentrat/refill-flaske inkluderet; Stativ til sæbeboblemaskine inkluderet; Sæbeboblevand inkluderet; Bakke/skål til sæbeboblevand inkluderet; Bærehåndtag/-strop inkluderet; Brugervejledning inkluderet; Fjernbetjening inkluderet; Ekstra sæbebobleringe inkluderet; Ekstra sæbeboblepinde inkluderet; USB-opladerkabel inkluderet; Andet
pt-PT: Itens incluídos da máquina de bolas de sabão: Adaptador CA incluído; Pilhas incluídas; Concentrado/garrafa de recarga incluído; Suporte para máquina de bolhas incluído; Líquido para bolhas incluído; Tabuleiro/prato de líquido para bolhas incluído; Pega/alça de transporte incluída; Manual de instruções incluído; Comando incluído; Aros de substituição incluídos; Aro(s) sobresselentes incluídos; Cabo de carregamento USB incluído; Outro
tr: Baloncuk makinesi dahil öğeler: AC adaptörü dahil; Piller dahil; Köpük konsantresi/yedek şişe dahil; Köpük makinesi standı dahil; Köpük solüsyonu dahil; Köpük solüsyon tepsisi/tabağı dahil; Taşıma sapı/askısı dahil; Kullanım kılavuzu dahil; Uzaktan kumanda dahil; Yedek köpük halkaları dahil; Yedek köpük çubuğu(ları) dahil; USB şarj kablosu dahil; Diğer
fi: Kuplakoneen mukana tulevat tarvikkeet: Mukana verkkolaite; Paristot mukana; Mukana kuplatiiviste/täyttöpullo; Mukana kuplakoneen teline; Kuplaneste mukana; Mukana kuplanestealusta/-astia; Kantokahva/-hihna mukana; Käyttöohje mukana; Kaukosäädin mukana; Varakuplarenkaat mukana; Varakuplasauva(t) mukana; USB-latauskaapeli mukana; Muu
pl: Elementy maszyny do baniek w zestawie: Zasilacz sieciowy; Baterie; Koncentrat / butelka uzupełniająca z płynem do baniek; Stojak na maszynę do baniek; Płyn do baniek; Tacka / pojemnik na płyn do baniek; Uchwyt / pasek do przenoszenia; Instrukcja obsługi; Pilot; Zapasowe pierścienie do baniek; Zapasowe różdżki do baniek; Kabel USB do ładowania; Inne
zh-TW: 包含泡泡機品項: 包含 AC 變壓器; 包含電池; 包含泡泡濃縮液/補充瓶; 包含泡泡機支架; 包含泡泡水; 包含泡泡水托盤/碟子; 包含提把/背帶; 包含使用說明書; 包含遙控器; 包含替換吹泡環; 包含備用吹泡棒; 包含 USB 充電線; 其他
ro-RO: Articole incluse pentru mașina de bule: Adaptor c.a. inclus; Baterii incluse; Concentrat/sticlă de rezervă pentru baloane inclusă; Suport aparat de făcut baloane inclus; Soluție pentru baloane inclusă; Tavă/vas pentru soluție de baloane inclus(ă); Mâner/curea de transport inclus(ă); Manual de instrucțiuni inclus; Telecomandă inclusă; Inele de schimb pentru baloane incluse; Baghetă(e) de schimb pentru baloane inclusă(e); Cablu de încărcare USB inclus; Altele
ja: バブルマシン関連アイテム付き: ACアダプター同梱; 電池同梱; 濃縮液/詰め替えボトル同梱; マシンスタンド同梱; シャボン玉液同梱; トレイ/受け皿同梱; キャリーハンドル/ストラップ同梱; 取扱説明書同梱; リモコン同梱; 交換用バブルリング同梱; 予備のバブルワンド同梱; USB充電ケーブル同梱; その他
ko: 포함된 버블 머신 구성품: AC 어댑터 포함; 배터리 포함; 비눗방울 원액/리필용 병 포함; 비눗방울 기계 스탠드 포함; 비눗방울 용액 포함; 비눗방울 용액 트레이/접시 포함; 운반용 핸들/스트랩 포함; 사용 설명서 포함; 리모컨 포함; 교체용 비눗방울 링 포함; 여분의 비눗방울 막대 포함; USB 충전 케이블 포함; 기타
sk-SK: Vrátane strojčeka na bublinky: Vrátane sieťového adaptéra; Vrátane batérií; Vrátane koncentrátu/náhradnej fľaše na bubliny; Vrátane stojana na výrobník bublín; Vrátane roztoku na bubliny; Vrátane podnosu/misky na roztok; Vrátane rukoväti/popruhu na prenášanie; Vrátane návodu na obsluhu; Vrátane diaľkového ovládača; Vrátane náhradných krúžkov na bubliny; Vrátane náhradných prútikov na bubliny; Vrátane nabíjacieho kábla USB; Iné